Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Article 9. Additional Cumulative Provisions.

§ 59-7-401.
Construction and effect of article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as repealing or altering any existing laws now on the statute books affecting any ports or port laws, and this article is to be considered supplementary, and any word, sentence or paragraph in this article that may be in conflict with the provisions of any other law shall not affect any such law. The constitutionality of this article shall not affect any existing law now on the statute, nor shall the constitutionality of any law now on the statutes be questioned with this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-403.
Levy of ad valorem tax in certain counties; disposition of proceeds of tax.

An ad valorem tax of one mill on each one dollar of the total assessed valuation of all the taxable property in each county or counties in the State of Mississippi, in which there is located a port or harbor where there is maintained a channel to a depth of not less than eight feet, is hereby levied on all taxable property, in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due. The receipts from said one mill tax shall be withheld by the tax collector of said county, and/or by any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, from receipts from state ad valorem taxes now in effect or which may be hereafter levied, so long as said state ad valorem taxes shall be not less than the said one mill tax herein levied. However, if no state ad valorem taxes equal to or greater than the said one mill tax herein levied is now or shall be hereafter levied, then and in that event, the said one mill tax herein levied shall continue to be levied and collected as herein provided in each such county or counties in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due. The said tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, shall pay over all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from the one mill tax to any trustee or successor thereto established as hereinafter provided in Section 59-7-429, and in the event that there is no such trustee, then said tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for collection of said taxes, shall pay over all such moneys into the county depository of each such county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a port fund. Any such moneys so paid into the county depository of each such county to the credit of said port fund may be expended at the direction of the port commission, appointed for any port or harbor through which commerce flows and having not less than eight industries engaged in the seafood industry. The provisions of this article shall be deemed to be a contract with the holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7590; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-405.
Powers of municipal authorities as to promotion, development, etc., of harbors and seaports.

The governing authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port or harbor through which commerce flows, and having not less than eight (8) industries engaged in the seafood industry, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than eight (8) feet, may engage in, either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided and designated, and such other agencies as hereafter may be provided by law, works of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, and either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided for, with the power and authority to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage and/or otherwise encumber, to construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports or harbors, wharves, piers, docks, warehouses, cold storage facilities, water and rail terminals, airplane landing fields and strips, and other structures and facilities, needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce and navigation, and including the dredging of channels and approaches to the facilities, and being authorized to fill in and reclaim bottomlands where incidental and necessary to the foregoing development.

A municipality, which is operating a port through a port commission under this section, may dissolve the port commission as provided in Section 59-7-408 and directly operate and maintain the port as provided under this article.

The municipal authorities or commission, in connection with the exercise of the foregoing works of improvement and development, may as an adjunct to any such work of improvement or development to erect or construct such bridges, causeways or structures as may be required for access to and from the harbors or facilities provided as aforesaid by the municipal authorities or the commission, and including any necessary bridge or causeway or combination of the same, connecting with any island or islands lying within three (3) leagues of the main shoreline of the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico, and whether the same be within or without the limits of the municipality concerned.

The municipal authorities or commission may procure, by gift, grant, purchase, or by the exercise of eminent domain, and for the public purposes and uses herein provided for, such land or interest therein as may be required for the purposes of this article, and regardless of whether the land be within or without the limits of the municipality involved.

The municipal authorities or commission, in the exercise of the powers granted hereunder, may provide any of the aforesaid facilities alone or in collaboration and in conjunction with any other public bodies, entities or commissions, as may now or hereafter be established by law.

The municipal authorities or commission may provide, among other harbor facilities, small craft and pleasure craft harbors and facilities needed therefor, including park and recreational facilities as an adjunct thereto, and in order to develop and promote tourist and recreational trade in the port.

The municipal authorities or commission have the power and authority to carry out the provisions of this article, to employ engineers, attorneys, and such employees as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this article, from time to time, and for the purpose of operating the facilities herein provided for, and may prescribe reasonable compensation in connection with such employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7591; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1960, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2004.).

§ 59-7-407.
Port commission; composition; appointment, compensation and terms of office of members; organization; dissolution.

A port commission created under this article shall consist of six (6) members who shall be qualified electors of the municipality operating under this article, and shall be appointed as follows: two (2) shall be appointed by the Governor, two (2) shall be appointed by the governing authorities of the municipality, and two (2) shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county. The commission shall have jurisdiction over the port, terminals, harbors and passes leading thereto, and all vessels, boats and wharves, common carriers and public utilities using the port. Commissioners shall be paid the uniform per diem compensation authorized in Section 25-3-69 for the discharge of official duties at meetings called in accordance with Section 59-7-409.

In the first instance, the two (2) commissioners appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for terms of five (5) and four (4) years, respectively, from the date of appointment; one (1) member appointed by the board of supervisors shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years from the date of appointment, and the members appointed by the governing authorities of the municipality shall be appointed for terms of two (2) and one (1) years, respectively, from the date of appointment. The additional member appointed by the board of supervisors shall be appointed to a term of five (5) years. After the first appointments, thereafter each member appointed shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years.

The commission shall, upon appointment, organize as provided in Section 59-7-409.

A port commission created under this article may be dissolved by the governing authorities of the municipality as provided under Section 59-7-408.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7592; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1960, ch. 344, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 444, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 385, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2004.).

§ 59-7-408.
Procedure and requirements for dissolution of municipal port commission.

The governing authorities of a municipality may dissolve a port commission created under this article by adopting a resolution in which they determine that the dissolution of the port commission is in the best interest of the citizens of the municipality and authorizing the municipality to assume the powers and duties of the port commission.

After the adoption of the dissolution resolution, the port commission shall enter into an agreement with the municipality which shall provide for:

the transfer of all powers, duties, and responsibilities of the port commission to the municipality;

the transfer of all property and assets, real and personal, of the port commission to the municipality;

the assignment of all contracts, leases, agreements and revenue generated by the port commission to the municipality;

the assumption by the municipality of all just claims and obligations of the port commission associated with the operation and maintenance of the port facilities; and

any other provisions necessary for the implementation of the dissolution.

All tax levies and assessments used for existing bonded indebtedness shall continue until such indebtedness is paid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 385, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2004.).

§ 59-7-409.
Meetings of commission; officers.

The port commission established by Section 59-7-407 shall meet at a regular place to be designated by the port commission for organization as a port commission, after giving at least ten (10) days’ notice of the time and place of the meeting by publication in a newspaper published in the city, and they shall elect a president and secretary who shall be members of the commission. The president shall be elected annually and shall vote only in cases of a tie vote.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7593; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1998, ch. 371, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 59-7-411.
Duties of commission generally; employees.

It shall be the duty of the commission to keep a minute book in which shall be recorded all of their acts, orders, rules and regulations. It shall be the duty of said commission to adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with law to govern their official acts. It shall be the duty of said commission to make and publish all needful rules and regulations to govern the harbor, docks, and passes within its jurisdiction, and to fix tariffs, fees, fines, penalties and forfeitures for the violations of the rules and regulations of said commission, and said commission shall have the power to fix and determine all port and terminal charges, and it may enforce the collection thereof through any court of competent jurisdiction in this state. This section shall not apply to public utilities nor to railroad terminal charges covered by or carried in approved tariffs authorized by Interstate Commerce Commission nor to lawful railroad operation and activities.

It shall be the duty of said commission to employ such help, including a port director, secretary, and such other help as will be necessary to carry on the business and work of such commission, and it will be the duty of said port commissioners to see that all port employees, such as harbormaster, pilots, and any and all other necessary employees for the operation of said port, perform any and all such duties as required for the operation of said port, at salaries to be determined by said port commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7594; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-413.
Maintenance and operation of improvements and facilities by commission; collection, etc., of rents, fees, etc.; disposition of revenues; annual reports.

All improvements and facilities constructed pursuant to this article shall be maintained and operated under the control of the port commission as provided by this article. The port commission shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement or agreements as may be made by any such municipality with the purchaser or purchasers of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, prescribe, levy and collect all rents, fees, tolls, revenues and/or other charges in connection with the use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of said improvements and facilities to any trustee, or successor thereto, established as hereinafter provided in Section 59-7-429. The net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. The port commission shall make an annual report to the governor of the State of Mississippi, to the municipality having such port or harbor, and to the state legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7595; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1970, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 59-7-415.
Authorization of issuance of bonds by municipalities; audit and inspection of accounts.

Any municipality, in which there is situated and located in whole or in part a port or harbor through which commerce flows and having not less than eight industries engaged in the seafood industry as aforesaid, is hereby given authority, upon the adoption of a resolution to such effect, to issue bonds or other obligations for any or all of the purposes as provided in this article. The books of account and other sources of information pertaining to duties under the provisions of this article, or any port commission, municipality and/or county affected by this article, shall be and remain at all times open to inspection and subject to audit by the holder or holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7597; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-417.
Exercise of authority for issuance of bonds; form, terms and conditions of bonds; execution of bonds; negotiability and sale of bonds; interim certificates.

The power to issue bonds or other obligations authorized by Section 59-7-415 shall be vested in, and may be exercised from time to time by the governing body of any such municipality described in said section. Such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body of any such municipality and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding twenty (20) years from their respective dates, be in such denomination, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such a manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of prior redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or resolutions may provide. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the mayor and clerk of such municipality, with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such mayor and clerk. Such bonds or other obligations may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the governing body of such municipality shall determine, but in no case to exceed the rate of interest hereinbefore provided. No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of this article for less than par and accrued interest.

Such bonds or other obligations may be issued by any municipality described in Section 59-7-415 in a principal amount not exceeding Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00) outstanding at any one (1) time for any purpose or purposes authorized by Section 59-7-405. Such municipality shall have power, out of any funds available, to purchase any bonds or other obligations issued by it pursuant to this article, and all bonds or other obligations so purchased shall be cancelled, and no bonds or other obligations shall be issued in lieu thereof. In anticipation of the issuance of the definitive bonds authorized by this article, any such municipality may issue interim certificates. Such interim certificates shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions or provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreement or agreements, relating to their discharge by payment or by the delivery of the definitive bonds, as such municipality, by resolution of its governing body, may determine. Any bonds, interim certificates or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, and may be validated as provided by statute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7601; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1960, ch. 344, § 3; Laws, 1970, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 17; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 30; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 38; Laws, 1984, ch. 444, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 452, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1988).

§ 59-7-419.
Disposition of proceeds of bonds; penalties for diversion; guarantee of payment.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be placed to the credit of such municipality in a bank or banks, which are members of the federal deposit insurance corporation and may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with any agreement or agreements entered into between such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose of such municipality. Any officer or other person diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose or purposes than the purpose or purposes originally set forth in said resolution of the governing body of said municipality shall be guilty of a felony and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on official bonds for such diversion.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the principal or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7602; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1944, ch. 216, § 2.

§ 59-7-421.
Mortgage or deed of trust securing bonds.

Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, is hereby given authority to execute and deliver a mortgage or deed of trust, in such form, with such validity and with such remedies as at present authorized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, on any or all properties, improvements and facilities, the acquisition, construction, maintenance and/or operation of which are provided for by this article. Such resolution or resolutions of said municipality shall prescribe the provisions, covenants and conditions of any such mortgage or deed of trust. Such provisions, covenants and conditions, if not self-executing, may be enforced by appropriate proceedings, either in law or in equity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7603; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-423.
Applicability of municipal debt limitations to bond issues; funds from which bonds payable.

The bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi pursuant to this article shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of debt which may be incurred by any such municipality, nor shall such bonds or other obligations be payable out of any funds other than the revenue collected or collectible from the use of said docks, harbors and facilities of whatsoever nature, and out of the receipts the said one mill ad valorem tax, in accordance with the provisions of Section 59-7-403.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7596; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-425.
Exemption from taxation of bonds.

Bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes, in so far as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi so to provide.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7600; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-427.
Powers of municipality with respect to issuance of bonds.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in order to secure the payment of said bonds or other obligations, such municipality shall have power:

To accept grants from the United States of America, the president of the United States, the federal emergency administrator of public works, or such other agencies, instrumentalities or corporations as may be designated or created to make grants or loans (hereinafter termed “federal agency”) pursuant to the national industry recovery act and any further act of the congress of the United States providing for the construction of useful public works (hereinafter termed “national industrial recovery act”), for or in aid of work, development or improvement authorized by this article.

To make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such provisions, covenants and conditions as in the discretion of the authorities of any such municipalities may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining or securing grants, loans, or other financial assistance from any federal agency pursuant to the national industrial recovery act; to make such further, different or additional contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in or for the furtherance of any work, development or improvement, including but not limited to all property, real and personal, appurtenant thereto or connected therewith and the existing work, development or improvement, if any, to which the work, development or improvement authorized by this article is an extension, addition, betterment or embellishment (hereinafter termed “work, development or improvement”) to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of any such contract or instrument.

To pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence.

To covenant against the pledging of all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence.

To covenant against the encumbering of all or any part of any work, development or improvement or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon.

To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by such municipality.

To provide for the preparation, specifications, terms, form, registration, extension, execution and authentication of any bonds or other obligations, issued pursuant to this article.

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

To covenant as to the fees, rents, revenues or tolls to be charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time and as to the use and disbursement to be made thereof.

To covenant to set aside or to pay over reserves and sinking funds and as to the disposal thereof.

To redeem prior to maturity, with or without premium, bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and to covenant for their prior redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of the interest on or principal of the bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article directly or indirectly by any means or in any manner.

To covenant as to books of account of such municipality and as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by such municipality of any covenant, condition or obligation assumed pursuant to this article.

To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient or desirable in order to secure any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, or in the absolute discretion of the authorities of such municipality in order to make such bonds or other obligations more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein or expressly authorized herein; it being the intention hereby to give the authorities of any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article the power to do all things in the issuance of said bonds or other obligations and for their execution that may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7598; Laws, 1940, ch. 290.

§ 59-7-429.
Trustees.

Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article shall, so long as any such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, authorize and appoint a trustee, satisfactory to the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, or any successor thereto, with the following powers and duties:

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from the aforesaid two-mill tax by the aforesaid tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, as provided for in Section 59-7-403;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all moneys paid or to be paid to it in accordance with Section 59-7-407, constituting the net revenues derived from the operation of the improvements and facilities authorized by this article;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall deposit all moneys received or to be received, in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the federal deposit insurance corporation, with such provisions for security therefor as may be incorporated in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall use and apply all such moneys so received to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, as the same becomes due, and shall use and apply any surplus remaining after such payment or payments for the prior redemption, with or without premium, of bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in accordance with the provisions of any agreement or agreements as may be made between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall have and be vested with all rights, powers and duties, in addition to the foregoing, as may be provided for in any agreement or agreements between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall by an instrument in writing, accept such trust and shall file such written acceptance of such trust with the clerk of the municipality so appointing such trustee;

If such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties herein imposed or that may be imposed by reason of any of the provisions of any agreement or agreements as aforesaid, such trustee, or any successor thereto, shall, on the written request of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of the holder or holders of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, be removed, by resolution duly adopted by the municipality by which such trustee, or any successor thereto, was appointed; and in such event, it shall be the duty of any such trustee so removed to effectuate a valid transfer of all moneys then in the possession or under the control of such trustee so removed to a duly appointed successor, and a failure on the part of such trustee so removed to do so shall constitute an embezzlement of such moneys and shall be punishable accordingly;

In the event any such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall be removed as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of any municipality which shall have removed any such trustee, immediately by resolution duly adopted to appoint a trustee as successor thereto, who is satisfactory to said holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7599; Laws, 1940, ch. 290; Laws, 1944, ch. 216, § 1.